Louisiana, session 2026, HB778.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:964(G) and 966.1 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§964. Composition of schedules
Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V shall, unless and until added pursuant to R.S.
40:962, consist of the following drugs or other substances, by whatever official
name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated:
SCHEDULE I
* * *
G. Miscellaneous. Unless specifically excepted or contained within a
pharmaceutical product approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound,
mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of a synthesized, semi-
synthesized, or a synthetic-like compound of the following substances, including
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1065 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 778
their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers,
or salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) 7-hydroxymitragynine
(2) Mitragynine
(3) Tianeptine
§966.1. Unlawful possession, production, or distribution of kratom products
A. For purposes of this Section, "kratom" means any substance derived from
the leaves of the Mitragyna speciosa tree or any substance containing
7-hydroxymitragynine or mitragynine.
B.(1) Manufacture; distribution. It shall be unlawful for any person to
knowingly produce, manufacture, distribute, or dispense, or possess with intent to
produce, manufacture, distribute, or dispense, kratom.
(2) Any person who violates Paragraph (1) of this Subsection for an amount
of:
(a) An aggregate weight of less than five hundred grams, shall be fined not
more than fifty thousand dollars, imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not less
than one year nor more than three years, or both.
(b) An aggregate weight of five hundred grams or more, shall be fined not
more than fifty thousand dollars, imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not less
than one year nor more than five years, or both.
C. Possession. It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to
possess kratom. Any person who violates this Subsection shall be punished as
follows:
(1) On a conviction wherein the offender possesses twenty grams or less, the
offender shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars.
(2) On a first conviction, wherein the offender possesses more than twenty
grams, the offender shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars, imprisoned in
the parish jail for not more than six months, or both.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1065 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 778
(3) On a second or any subsequent conviction, wherein the offender possesses
more than twenty grams, the offender shall be fined not more than one thousand
dollars, imprisoned in the parish jail for not more than six months, or both.
A. No person shall possess, produce, or distribute a product that contains any
of the following:
(1) A level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction that is greater
than two percent of total alkaloids in a container and with a single serving of a
product exceeding one milligram per serving of 7-hydroxymitragynine.
(2) A level of mitragynine in its natural form, or that is extracted using FDA-
approved food solvents that limit the potency of the product, which contains levels
of residual solvents higher than is allowed in the U.S. Pharmacopeia 467, or a single
serving size of greater than eighty milligrams.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Synthesized" means created by chemical synthesis or biosynthetic
methods including fermentation, recombitant techniques, yeast derived enzymatic
techniques, and oxidation, rather than by traditional food preparation techniques,
such as heating or extracting.
(2) "Semi-synthetic alkaloid" means a substance derived from an alkaloid
occurring in kratom that has been chemically altered through chemical reactions such
as oxidation, reduction, acetylation, or other processes to change the structure or
pharmacological activity of the naturally occurring kratom alkaloid or the synthesis
of 7-hydroxymitragynine when produced by chemical alteration of mitragynine.
(3) "Synthetic kratom-like compound" means a substance that is not found
naturally in the Mitragyna speciosa plant and is created entirely through laboratory
synthesis to mimic the pharmacological effects of kratom alkaloids.
(4) "Synthesized kratom product" means any synthesized derivative of the
Mitragyna speciosa plant.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1065 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 778
C.(1) A person who unlawfully possesses two grams or less of a synthesized
kratom product shall be fined five hundred dollars.
(2) A person who unlawfully possesses more than two grams of synthesized
kratom or a synthesized kratom product, or cultivates or otherwise produces
synthesized kratom or a synthesized kratom product, or sells or otherwise distributes
synthesized kratom or a synthesized kratom product, shall be fined not less than two
thousand dollars or imprisoned for not less than one year nor more than five years,
with or without hard labor.